Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-129
Adjutant General; reports.

The Adjutant General shall make reports at such times and as to such matters as the Governor may require. He or she shall make such reports and returns to the Department of the Army and Air Force or the President of the United States as may be required by laws or regulations.

Laws 1917, c. 205, § 4, p. 485;

Laws 1919, c. 121, § 2, p. 289;

Laws 1921, c. 234, § 1, p. 833;

C.S.1922, § 3305;

C.S.1929, § 55-125;

R.S.1943, § 55-148;

Laws 1953, c. 188, § 23, p. 601;

Laws 1955, c. 231, § 11, p. 722;

R.R.S.1943, § 55-148;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 27, p. 1590;

Laws 1981, LB 545, § 16.